Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1110
Jury; separation; admonition of court.

If the jury are permitted to separate either during the trial or after the case is submitted to them, they shall be admonished by the court that it is their duty not to converse with or suffer themselves to be addressed by any other person on the subject of the trial, and that it is their duty not to form or express any opinion thereon until the cause is finally submitted to them.

R.S.1867, Code § 286, p. 442;

R.S.1913, § 7849;

C.S.1922, § 8793;

C.S.1929, § 20-1110;

R.S.1943, § 25-1110.

This section does not apply to criminal prosecutions. Sundahl v. State, 154 Neb. 550, 48 N.W.2d 689 (1951).